Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2719
Equity purchase contract; form.

Every equity purchase contract shall be written in at least twelve-point, boldface type and fully completed, signed, and dated by the homeowner and equity purchaser prior to the execution of any instrument quitclaiming, assigning, transferring, conveying, or encumbering an interest in the residence in foreclosure.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 19.